Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1421
Financial transaction, defined.

Financial transaction shall mean a loan, purchase, sale, or other type of transfer or exchange of money, goods, other property, or services for value.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 21.